src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_FAKT-SG !!= @CODE@ fakt:fakt 135
 NMN_FAKT-SG	;

!LEXICON PROP_TAS !!= @CODE@ tas:tas 136
! NMN_TAS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 137
!LEXICON PROP_NEITST
! NMN_NEITST ;
!!= @CODE@ : 138
!LEXICON PROP_SĪEND
! NMN_SĪEND ;
!!= @CODE@ lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
!LEXICON PROP_LǞʼND
! NMN_LǞʼND ;

LEXICON PROP_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ : 140
 NMN_ĀIGAST ;

LEXICON PROP_ANALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 141
 NMN_ANALĪZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīʼem 142
! NMN_NĪʼEM	;

LEXICON PROP_NĪʼEM-SG !!= @CODE@ nīʼem:nīʼem 142
 NMN_NĪʼEM-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_JAĻKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 143
 NMN_JAĻKŠ ;

!LEXICON PROP_VIŠ !!= @CODE@ : 144
! NMN_VIŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_RŪʼTŠ !!= @CODE@ rūʼtš:rūʼtš 145
 NMN_RŪʼTŠ	;

!!= @CODE@ tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146
!LEXICON PROP_TĒʼḐ
! NMN_TĒʼḐ ;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼḑ:lēḑ 147
!LEXICON PROP_LĒʼḐ
! NMN_LĒʼḐ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 148
!LEXICON PROP_KĪNTŠ
! NMN_KĪNTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 149
!LEXICON PROP_KǬŅTŠ
! NMN_KǬŅTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 150
!LEXICON PROP_LĒŅTŠ
! NMN_LĒŅTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 151
!LEXICON PROP_LĪEM
! NMN_LĪEM ;
!!= @CODE@ aʼm:am 152
!LEXICON PROP_AʼM
! NMN_AʼM ;

!LEXICON PROP_AZŪM !!= @CODE@ : 153
! NMN_AZŪM ;

!LEXICON PROP_VÕȚĪM !!= @CODE@ : 154
! NMN_VÕȚĪM ;

!!= @CODE@ : 155
!LEXICON PROP_KǬŅIM
! NMN_KǬŅIM ;
!!= @CODE@ : 156
LEXICON PROP_ĒTAM
 NMN_ĒTAM ;

LEXICON PROP_SIDĀM !!= @CODE@ : 157
 NMN_SIDĀM  ;

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG !!= @CODE@ : 158
 NMN_TŪOITÕG	;

LEXICON PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG !!= @CODE@ : 158
 NMN_TŪOITÕG-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND !!= @CODE@ : 159
 NMN_KǬRAND	;

LEXICON PROP_KǬRAND-SG !!= @CODE@ : 159
 NMN_KǬRAND-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_ȬʼDÕG !!= @CODE@ ȭʼdõg:ȭʼdõg 160
 NMN_ȬʼDÕG	;
!!= @CODE@ : 161
!LEXICON PROP_TAPTÕD
! NMN_TAPTÕD ;
!!= @CODE@ tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
!LEXICON PROP_TĪʼEDÕD
! NMN_TĪʼEDÕD ;
!!= @CODE@ : 163
!LEXICON PROP_VĪDÕZ
! NMN_VĪDÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 164
!LEXICON PROP_TUOISTÕNZ
! NMN_TUOISTÕNZ ;
!!= @CODE@ īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
!LEXICON PROP_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ
! NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 166
!LEXICON PROP_MĪEZ
! NMN_MĪEZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 167
!LEXICON PROP_ROʼVZ
! NMN_ROʼVZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 168
!LEXICON PROP_KÄBRĀZ
! NMN_KÄBRĀZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_MAIGĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 169
! NMN_MAIGĀZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_NÕTKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 170
! NMN_NÕTKĀZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_RIKĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 171
! NMN_RIKĀZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_BIKŠĀZ !!= @CODE@ : 172
! NMN_BIKŠĀZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ĀMBAZ !!= @CODE@ : 173
! NMN_ĀMBAZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_PŪŖAZ !!= @CODE@ : 174
! NMN_PŪŖAZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 175
!LEXICON PROP_PǬĻAZ
! NMN_PǬĻAZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_RĒNAZ !!= @CODE@ : 176
! NMN_RĒNAZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_TŌVAZ !!= @CODE@ : 177
! NMN_TŌVAZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 178
!LEXICON PROP_PŪORAZ
! NMN_PŪORAZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 179
!LEXICON PROP_MÕTKÕZ
! NMN_MÕTKÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 180
!LEXICON PROP_VȬRÕZ
! NMN_VȬRÕZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ARĀGÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 181
! NMN_ARĀGÕZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ÄʼGGÕZ !!= @CODE@ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
! NMN_ÄʼGGÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
LEXICON PROP_PŪʼDÕZ
 NMN_PŪʼDÕZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_VĪETŠÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 184
! NMN_VĪETŠÕZ ;

!!= @CODE@ lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185
!LEXICON PROP_LǬʼTŠÕZ
! NMN_LǬʼTŠÕZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 186
!LEXICON PROP_SĒJI
! NMN_SĒJI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 187
!LEXICON PROP_AKKIJI
! NMN_AKKIJI ;
!!= @CODE@ lēʼji:lēji 188
!LEXICON PROP_LĒʼJI
! NMN_LĒʼJI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 189
!LEXICON PROP_TUĻĻI
! NMN_TUĻĻI ;
!!= @CODE@ läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190
!LEXICON PROP_LÄʼBḐI
! NMN_LÄʼBḐI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 191
!LEXICON PROP_NAI
! NMN_NAI ;

!LEXICON PROP_AʼIGI !!= @CODE@ aʼigi:aigi 192
! NMN_AʼIGI ;



!!= @CODE@ puʼnni:punni 193
!LEXICON PROP_PUʼNNI
! NMN_PUʼNNI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 194
!LEXICON PROP_KAȚKI
! NMN_KAȚKI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 195
!LEXICON PROP_KUKKI
! NMN_KUKKI ;
!!= @CODE@ aigi:aigi 196
!LEXICON PROP_AIGI
! NMN_AIGI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 197
!LEXICON PROP_OUKI
! NMN_OUKI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 198
!LEXICON PROP_PAŖĪ
! NMN_PAŖĪ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 199
!LEXICON PROP_TŪĻI
! NMN_TŪĻI ;
!!= @CODE@ aʼbli:abli 200
!LEXICON PROP_AʼBLI
! NMN_AʼBLI ;
!!= @CODE@ : 201
LEXICON PROP_SĒMI
 NMN_SĒMI ;

!!= @CODE@ lēʼmi:lēmi 202
!LEXICON PROP_LĒʼMI
! NMN_LĒʼMI ;

!LEXICON PROP_ALĪZ !!= @CODE@ : 203
! NMN_ALĪZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_NȬŖKÕZ !!= @CODE@ : 204
! NMN_NȬŖKÕZ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KATŪKS !!= @CODE@ : 205
! NMN_KATŪKS  ;

LEXICON PROP_ĀNDÕKS !!= @CODE@ : 206
 NMN_ĀNDÕKS ;

!!= @CODE@ : 207
!LEXICON PROP_KĒRATÕKS
! NMN_KĒRATÕKS ;
!!= @CODE@ äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
!LEXICON PROP_ÄʼBȚÕKS
! NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 209
!LEXICON PROP_VARĪKŠ
! NMN_VARĪKŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 210
!LEXICON PROP_UKŠ
! NMN_UKŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 211
!LEXICON PROP_LÄPŠ
! NMN_LÄPŠ ;

!LEXICON PROP_TUʼĻ !!= @CODE@ : 213
! NMN_TUʼĻ ;
!LEXICON PROP_TŪĻ !!= @CODE@ : 214
! NMN_TŪĻ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KĒĻ !!= @CODE@ : 215
! NMN_KĒĻ ;

LEXICON PROP_PŪOL !!= @CODE@ : 216
 NMN_PŪOL ;

!LEXICON PROP_ĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 217
! NMN_ĪKŠ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KAKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 218
! NMN_KAKŠ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ŪŽ !!= @CODE@ : 219
! NMN_ŪŽ ;

!LEXICON PROP_SĒŅ !!= @CODE@ : 220
! NMN_SĒŅ ;

!LEXICON PROP_JŪŖ !!= @CODE@ : 221
! NMN_JŪŖ 	;

LEXICON PROP_SŪR !!= @CODE@ : 222
 NMN_SŪR 	;

!LEXICON PROP_SĒR !!= @CODE@ : 223
! NMN_SĒR 	;

LEXICON PROP_BIRKOV !!= @CODE@ : 224
 NMN_BIRKOV 	;

!LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ !!= @CODE@ : 225
! NMN_SALĀJ	;

LEXICON PROP_SALĀJ-SG !!= @CODE@ : 225
 NMN_SALĀJ-SG	;

!LEXICON PROP_UMĀRZ !!= @CODE@ umārz:umār 226
! NMN_UMĀRZ   ;

!LEXICON PROP_DULLÕNZ !!= @CODE@ dullõnz:dullõn 227
! NMN_UMĀRZ	;

!LEXICON PROP_AʼBBÕNZ !!= @CODE@ aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
! NMN_UMĀRZ	;

!LEXICON PROP_AŅGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
! NMN_UMĀRZ	;

!LEXICON PROP_KAʼGGÕRZ !!= @CODE@ kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
! NMN_UMĀRZ	;

!LEXICON PROP_PǞGIŅŽ !!= @CODE@ pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
! NMN_UMĀRZ	;

!LEXICON PROP_VAGĀŖ !!= @CODE@ vagāŗ:vagāŗ 232
! NMN_VAGĀŖ 	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
 NMN_TIDĀR	;

!LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-SG !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
! NMN_TIDĀR-SG	;

LEXICON PROP_TIDĀR-PL !!= @CODE@ tidār:tidār 233
 NMN_TIDĀR-PL	;

LEXICON PROP_PĒGAL !!= @CODE@ pēgal:pēgal 234
 NMN_PĒGAL 	;

LEXICON PROP_APPÕN !!= @CODE@ appõn:appõn 235
 NMN_APPÕN 	;

!LEXICON PROP_ǬʼRÕN !!= @CODE@ ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
! NMN_ǬʼRÕN  	;

LEXICON PROP_KĪNDÕR !!= @CODE@ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
 NMN_KĪNDÕR 	;

!LEXICON PROP_BÄʼZMÕR !!= @CODE@ bäʼzmõr:bäzmõr 238
! NMN_BÄʼZMÕR 	;

!LEXICON PROP_TARĪĻ !!= @CODE@ tarīļ:tarīļ 239
! NMN_TARĪĻ 	;

!LEXICON PROP_ĀNKAŖ !!= @CODE@ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
! NMN_ĀNKAŖ 	;

!LEXICON PROP_VIRPÕĻ !!= @CODE@ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
! NMN_VIRPÕĻ 	;

!LEXICON PROP_ǬʼBIĻ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
! NMN_ǬʼBIĻ	;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
