src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Abrig+N+Prop:Aʼbrig PROP_ȬʼDÕG  "Abruka" ;
Aņtš+N+Prop:Aņtš PROP_JAĻKŠ  "Ance" ;
Brissõl+N+Prop:Brissõl PROP_APPÕN  "Bryssel" ;
Dūmõl+N+Prop:Dūmõl PROP_APPÕN  "Dūmele" ;
Dūobõl+N+Prop:Dūobõl PROP_APPÕN  "Dobele" ;
Dūoņig+N+Prop:Dūoņig PROP_KǬRAND  "Dundaga" ;
Hapsal+N+Prop:Hapsal PROP_PĒGAL  "Haapsalu" ;
Irāj+N+Prop:Irāj PROP_SALĀJ-SG  "Mazirbe" ;
Jālgab+N+Prop:Jālgab PROP_ĒTAM  "Jelgava" ;
Japān+N+Prop:Japān PROP_TIDĀR  "Japani" ;
Kāndab+N+Prop:Kāndab PROP_ĒTAM  "Kandava" ;
Kuldīg+N+Prop:Kuldīg PROP_SIDĀM  "Kuldīga" ;
Kuoštrõg+N+Prop:Kuoštrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG  "Košrags" ;
Kuresār+N+Prop:Kuresār PROP_APPÕN  "Kuressaare" ;
Limbaž+N+Prop:Limbaž PROP_JAĻKŠ  "Limbaži" ;
London+N+Prop:London PROP_PĒGAL  "Lontoo" ;
Lūž+N+Prop:Lūʼž PROP_RŪʼTŠ  "Lūžņa" ;
Moldov+N+Prop:Moldov PROP_BIRKOV  "Moldova" ;
Moskov+N+Prop:Moskov PROP_BIRKOV  "Moskova" ;
Nabāld+N+Prop:Nabāl PROP_TIDĀR-PL  "Nabaļu-suo" ;
Ōst+N+Prop:Ōst PROP_FAKT-SG  "Aizklāņi" ;
Parīz+N+Prop:Parīz PROP_ĀIGAST  "Pariisi" ;
Patskul+N+Prop:Patskul PROP_APPÕN  "Packule" ;
Pǟrnov+N+Prop:Pǟrnov PROP_BIRKOV  "Pärnu" ;
Piltõn+N+Prop:Piltõn PROP_APPÕN  "Piltene" ;
Pitrõg+N+Prop:Pitrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG  "Pitrags" ;
Portugal+N+Prop:Portugal PROP_APPÕN  "Portugali" ;
Salāts+N+Prop:Salāts PROP_ĀIGAST  "Salaca" ;
Sǟnag+N+Prop:Sǟnag PROP_TŪOITÕG-SG  "Saunags" ;
Sǟr+N+Prop:Sǟr PROP_SŪR  "Sõrve" ;
Sīkrõg+N+Prop:Sīkrõg PROP_KǬRAND-SG  "Sīkrags" ;
Sūrsūo+N+Prop:Sūr#sūo PROP_SŪR  "Dižpurvs-suo" ;
Šlītõr+N+Prop:Šlītõr PROP_KĪNDÕR  "Slītere" ;
Tallin+N+Prop:Tallin PROP_ĀIGAST  "Tallinna" ;
Ugāl+N+Prop:Ugāl PROP_TIDĀR  "Ugāle" ;
Ungar+N+Prop:Ungar PROP_TIDĀR  "Unkari" ;
Vaid+N+Prop:Vaʼid PROP_NĪʼEM-SG  "Vaide" ;
Vīḑõl+N+Prop:Vīḑõl PROP_APPÕN  "Vīdale" ;
Brēmen+N+Prop:Brēmen PROP_PĒGAL  "Bremen" ;
Pētõr+N+Prop:Pētõr PROP_KĪNDÕR  "Pētõr" ;
Kōrli+N+Prop:Kōrli PROP_SĒMI  "Kōrli" ;
Didrõk+N+Prop:Didrõk PROP_TŪOITÕG  "Didrõk" ;
Dantsig+N+Prop:Dantsig PROP_KǬRAND  "Danzig" ;
Prūš+N+Prop:Prūš PROP_RŪʼTŠ  "Preussi" ;
Aņdrõks+N+Prop:Aņdrõks PROP_ĀNDÕKS  "Aņdrõks" ;
Afganistān+N+Prop:Afganistān PROP_TIDĀR  "Afganistan" ;
Argentīn+N+Prop:Argentīn PROP_ANALĪZ  "Argentiina" ;
Butān+N+Prop:Butān PROP_TIDĀR  "Bhutan" ;
Pētõrburg+N+Prop:Pētõrburg PROP_ĀIGAST  "Pietari" ;
Jēzus+N+Prop:Jēzus PROP_ĀIGAST  "Jeesus" ;
Kristus+N+Prop:Kristus PROP_ĀIGAST  "Kristus" ;
Paulus+N+Prop:Paulus PROP_ĀIGAST  "Paavali" ;
Mõtsāpūol+N+Prop:Mõtsā#pūol PROP_PŪOL  "Metsepole" ;
Ōdõz+N+Prop:Ōdõ PROP_PŪʼDÕZ  "Ādaži" ;
Weimar+N+Prop:Weimar PROP_PĒGAL  "Weimar" ;
Zürich+N+Prop:Zürich PROP_ĀIGAST  "Zürich" ;
Daugavpils+N+Prop:Daugavpils PROP_ĀIGAST  "Daugavpils" ;
